Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-713
Meetings, where held; annual and special meetings.

Meetings of members may be held at such place as may be provided in the bylaws. In the absence of any such provision, all meetings shall be held in the principal office of the corporation in this state. An annual meeting of the members shall be held at such time as may be provided in the bylaws. Failure to hold the annual meeting at the designated time shall not work forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation. Special meetings of the members may be called by the president, by the board of directors, by a petition signed by not less than one-tenth of all the members, or by such other officers or persons as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 13, p. 207;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-813;

R.S.1943, § 70-713.